Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-404
Allowable expenses, defined.

Allowable expenses shall mean:

(1) All costs associated with the purchasing, printing, or manufacturing of any items to be used or distributed to participants such as tickets;

(2) All office expenses;

(3) All promotional expenses;

(4) The tax on gross proceeds prescribed in section 9-429;

(5) All license and permit fees prescribed by the Nebraska Lottery and Raffle Act;

(6) Any tax or fee imposed pursuant to section 9-433; and

(7) Any fee paid to any person associated with the operation of any lottery or raffle.

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 125;

Laws 1994, LB 694, § 96.